Vermont, session 2025-2026, H352.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 8005b is added to read:
§ 8005b. RENEWABLE ENERGY FOR COMMUNITIES PROGRAM
(a) Establishment. The Renewable Energy for Communities Program is
established. To achieve the goals of subdivision 8005(a)(2) of this title, the
Commission shall develop the Renewable Energy for Communities Program
that meets the eligibility requirements of this section, which may be
implemented by rule, order, or contract. Retail electricity providers shall issue
periodic solicitations subject to the requirements of the Renewable Energy for
Communities Program.
VT LEG #379412 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.352
2025 Page 2 of 8
(b) Eligible resources. Distributed renewable generation as defined in
subdivision 8005(a)(2)(B) of this chapter shall be eligible to participate in this
Program.
(c) Objectives. It shall be the objective of the Program to develop
distributed renewable generation at least-cost to ratepayers that is directed by,
developed in consultation with, and directly benefits communities by one or
more of the following:
(1) delivering benefits from renewable energy systems to customers who
have historically been marginalized or faced inequitable access to the benefits
of renewable energy, including environmental justice focus populations as
defined in 3 V.S.A. § 6002;
(2) supporting community participation in the development and
governance of distributed renewable generation;
(3) supporting the delivery of benefits to tenants of buildings that are
designated as affordable housing;
(4) supporting the delivery of benefits to school and municipally owned
buildings; and
(5) advancing other priority issues as identified during program
development as detailed under subsection (f) of this section.
(d) Capacity requirement. Retail electricity providers shall issue
solicitations for distributed renewable generation equivalent to a percentage of
VT LEG #379412 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.352
2025 Page 3 of 8
their requirement under subdivision 8005(a)(2) of this title, as determined by
the Commission.
(e) Solicitation requirement.
(1) On a schedule to be developed by the Commission, each retail
electricity provider with an obligation under subdivision 8005(a)(2) of this title
shall issue solicitations for eligible distributed generation until it has met its
capacity requirement. Coordinated solicitations shall be encouraged. Each
retail electric provider shall review proposed projects in its service territory
according to a set of consistent core criteria as approved by the Commission
and consistent with the objectives set forth in this section.
(2) Requirements for retail electricity providers that are 100 percent
renewable pursuant to subdivision 8005(b)(1) of this title may be limited by
the Commission to an amount equal to the provider’s requirement to meet
distributed generation with load growth above the baseline year of 2024 and
allowed on a less frequent solicitation schedule.
(f) Program development. On or before January 1, 2027, the Commission
shall implement the Renewable Energy for Communities Program. In
developing the program, the Commission shall:
(1) determine principles to guide the development of eligible distributed
generation and consider whether additional objectives for the program as
defined under subsection (c) of this section are necessary;
VT LEG #379412 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.352
2025 Page 4 of 8
(2) determine whether a percentage of each retail electricity provider’s
capacity requirement should be reserved to serve specific customers who have
previously experienced inequitable access to the benefits of renewable energy
and determine any minimum requirement for those projects procured under
this program for serving those specific customers;
(3) establish a set of consistent review criteria to be used by all retail
electricity providers in solicitations for eligible distributed generation,
considering issues in addition to cost, including community support or
engagement while developing the proposal; potential for local workforce
development and other community benefits to be delivered to the host
community; location of the project, including whether it is in a constrained
area of the distribution or transmission system or in an area identified as a
preferred location in a regional or municipal enhanced energy plan pursuant to
24 V.S.A. § 4352; and anticipated generation profile;
(4) identify reporting requirements and necessary metrics to monitor
how benefits and burdens from the program are distributed across ratepayers;
(5) consult with individuals representing a diverse array of perspectives,
including at minimum representation from industry, retail electric providers,
environmental advocates, State agencies, regional and local governments,
communities identified as environmental justice focus populations in 3 V.S.A.
§ 6002, municipalities experiencing high energy burden as identified by
VT LEG #379412 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.352
2025 Page 5 of 8
Efficiency Vermont’s 2023 Energy Burden Report, renters, and multifamily
affordable housing representatives;
(6) determine a process for exempting or deferring retail electricity
provider requirements under this section in the event no proposals below the
applicable alternative compliance payment are received in response to a retail
electricity provider’s solicitation;
(7) determine a process for evaluating and reporting on the success of
the program in achieving the stated goals; and
(8) consider other issues as identified throughout the process.
(g) Assistance. The Commission may use its authority under sections 20
and 21 of this title as may be necessary to support engagement and technical
analysis necessary to develop the Program. Funding may be used to support
per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under
32 V.S.A. § 1010 to conduct engagement with parties who are not otherwise
compensated by their employer.
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 8002 is amended to read:
§ 8002. DEFINITIONS
* * *
(10) “Group net metering system” means a net metering system serving
more than one customer, or a single customer with multiple electric meters,
located within the service area of the same retail electricity provider. Various
VT LEG #379412 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.352
2025 Page 6 of 8
buildings owned by municipalities, including water and wastewater districts,
fire districts, villages, school districts, and towns, may constitute a group net
metering system. A union or district school facility may be considered in the
same group net metering system with buildings of its member schools that are
located within the service area of the same retail electricity provider. A system
that files a complete application for a certificate of public good on or after
January 1, 2026 2027 shall not qualify for group net metering, unless the plant
will be located on the same parcel, or a parcel adjacent to, the parcel where the
energy is utilized.
* * *
(16) “Net metering system” means a plant for generation of electricity
that:
(A) is of not more than 500 kW capacity;
(B) operates in parallel with facilities of the electric distribution
system;
(C) is intended primarily to offset the customer’s own electricity
requirements and does not primarily supply electricity to electric vehicle
supply equipment, as defined in section 201 of this title, for the resale of
electricity to the public by the kWh or for other retail sales to the public,
including those based in whole or in part on a flat fee per charging session or a
VT LEG #379412 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.352
2025 Page 7 of 8
time-based fee for occupying a parking space while using electric vehicle
supply equipment;
(D)(i) employs a renewable energy source; or
(ii) is a qualified micro-combined heat and power system of 20
kW or fewer that meets the definition of combined heat and power in
subsection 8015(b) of this title and uses any fuel source that meets air quality
standards; and
(E)(i) for a system that files a complete application for a certificate of
public good after December 31, 2024, except for systems as provided for in
subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (E), generates energy that will be used on
the same parcel as, or a parcel adjacent to, the parcel where the plant is located;
(ii) for a system that files a complete application for a certificate
of public good after December 31, 2025 2026, if the system serves a
multifamily building containing qualified rental units serving low-income
tenants, as defined under 32 V.S.A. § 5404a(a)(6), generates energy that will
be used on the same parcel as, or a parcel adjacent to, the parcel where the
plant is located; and
(iii) for purposes of subdivisions (10) of this section and this
subdivision (16), two parcels shall be adjacent if they share a property
boundary or are adjacent and separated only by a river, stream, railroad line,
private road, public highway, or similar intervening landform.
VT LEG #379412 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.352
2025 Page 8 of 8
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379412 v.2